Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.300

State board for volunteer firefighters and reserve officers—Vouchers, warrants.

All expenses incurred by the state board shall be accomplished by vouchers signed by the secretary and one member of the state board and issued to the persons entitled thereto and sent to the proper state agency. The proper state agency shall issue a warrant on the principal fund or administrative fund for the amount specified.

[ 1999 c 148 s 26; 1979 ex.s. c 157 s 2; 1969 c 118 s 9; 1955 c 263 s 7.]